Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 16

State Officers

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

25-16-101. [Repealed.]

25-16-103. Registration of certain agency officials as lobbyists.

An individual employed as an executive head of a state agency or as a chief deputy of an executive head of a state agency is not eligible to be registered as a lobbyist under §21-8-601 et seq. until one (1) year after the expiration of the individual's employment in that capacity.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 486, § 4.

Subchapter 2

— Governor

Preambles. Acts 1853, p. 127 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, it is proper that the Governor should have in his possession the reports of the various state officers, showing the condition of the affairs of the state, to enable him to prepare his message to the General Assembly, with convenience, and based on official information; therefore….”

Acts 1983, No. 186 contained a preamble which read:

“For the purpose of this Act, “transition funds” shall mean any funds advanced to an individual who has been elected Governor during the general election of each election year. However, this Act shall not apply to a person who is reelected during the general election to the Office of Governor.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1846, p. 72, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1853, p. 127, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1971, No. 139, § 2: Feb. 22, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the reorganization of the state agencies within the executive department of government effectuated by the Sixty-Eighth General Assembly may, in certain circumstances, jeopardize the state's continued participation in federal programs benefitting the people of this state, or may jeopardize the state's opportunity to obtain the benefits of new or expanded federal programs, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the Governor, by executive order, to effectuate such additional reorganizations within the executive department of government as may be mandated by federal law or regulations promulgated thereunder, to enable the State of Arkansas to continue to obtain the benefits of federal programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-16-201. Reorganization of agencies to meet federal program requirements.

In order to protect the state's participation in various federal programs and to continue to obtain the benefits of those programs for the people of this state or where necessary to obtain the benefits of new or expanded federal programs, the Governor is authorized, by executive order, to establish, combine, abolish, or otherwise reorganize any of the agencies, departments, divisions, sections, or units within the executive department of government where the changes or reorganizations are necessary to comply with the applicable federal law or regulations governing federal programs.

However, whenever any executive order may move from the jurisdiction of any office, department, institution, or other agency any authority or jurisdiction of the agency in effect at the time of the order, the order shall be subject to confirmation by the General Assembly in the next following regular session, fiscal session, or special session, and the General Assembly by joint resolution may rescind the executive order.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (b), inserted “session, fiscal session” following “regular” and made a minor punctuation change.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning enabling legislation for interim agencies and programs, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 646, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 605, § 4; 1981, No. 686, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-152.1.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 139, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-311; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 45.

25-16-202. [Repealed.]

The Auditor of State and Treasurer of State shall make their respective reports for each regular session to the Governor on or before October 10 next preceding the regular session of the General Assembly. The Governor shall cause the reports to be printed with his or her biennial message and have them ready for the General Assembly on or before the Wednesday of the first week of the regular session of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1853, § 1, p. 127; C. & M. Dig., § 4387; Pope's Dig., § 5399; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-302; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 46.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in the first sentence, substituted “each regular session” for “each biennial session” and “the regular session” for “the regular meeting”; and inserted “regular” in the second sentence.

Cross References. Quarterly reports of state officers to be included in message, §21-7-303.

25-16-204. Appointment of commissioners in other states.

The Governor may nominate, appoint, and commission, under the Great Seal of Arkansas, or may continue in office one (1) or more commissioners within any other state or territory of the United States. The commissioners shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor then in office and shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations and to take depositions, affidavits, and the proof and acknowledgment of deeds or other instruments of writing, under seal, to be used or recorded in this state.

All oaths administered by the commissioners, all affidavits and depositions taken by them, and all acknowledgments, etc., certified by them shall be as effectual in law, to all intents and purposes, as if done and certified by any justice of the peace or other authorized officer within this state.

Before any commissioner shall proceed to discharge any of the duties of his or her appointment, he or she shall take and subscribe an oath before some justice of the peace, or other officer authorized to administer oaths in the state for which the commissioner is appointed, that he or she will well and faithfully discharge all the duties of his or her appointment. The oath, together with the signature and an impression of the seal of the commissioner, shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State within six (6) months after its taking.

The affidavits to procure an attachment may be made before a commissioner. Grider v. Williams, 25 Ark. 1 (1867).

Commissioner may take affidavits to authenticate claims against an estate. Kaufman & Co. v. Stone, 25 Ark. 336 (1869).

A commissioner's certificate proves itself, and needs no authentication. Smith & Bro. v. Van Gilder, 26 Ark. 527 (1871).

Depositions taken before a commissioner of deeds appointed by the governor of this state to act in another state may be read in evidence, without other proof of the appointment and authority of such commissioner than his own certificate and official seal. Johnson v. Cocks, 12 Ark. (7 English) 672 (1852).

The term of office of a commissioner does not expire with the term of office of the governor appointing him. Kaufman & Co. v. Stone, 25 Ark. 336 (1869).

Arkansas Legislative Audit is authorized and directed to perform an audit on the expenditures of transition funds. The audit shall be presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Legislative Council during the biennium following the expenditure of the funds.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Division of Volunteerism, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 403, § 19. A former similar section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 865, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-322 — 12-325; Acts 1989, No. 143, § 1; 1989, No. 186, § 1. For present law see §25-10-128.

Effective Dates. Acts 1953, No. 219, § 6: Mar. 5, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the services of an administrative assistant are essential to the operation of the Lieutenant Governor's office; therefore this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its approval.”

ALR.

Validity, construction, and effect of state statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees. 51 A.L.R.4th 702.

C.J.S. 81A C.J.S., States, § 131.

History.

Acts 1846, §§ 1-3, p. 72; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1424-1426; Pope's Dig., §§ 1671-1673; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1501 — 12-1503.

25-16-205. Transition funds.

For the purpose of this section, “transition funds” shall mean any funds advanced to an individual who has been elected Governor during the general election of each election year. However, this section shall not apply to a person who is reelected during the general election to the Office of Governor.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue limitations and guidelines on the expenditure of transition funds and make those limitations and guidelines a part of any appropriation.

(1)The expenditure of transition funds is limited to the direct expenses of the activities relating to the new office holder preparing to take office in January following the general election.

The expenditure of transition funds and other related charges incurred by a newly elected officer in the performance of his or her duties to prepare for service as a public official shall be limited to those expenditures which are directly related to his or her assuming office in January. It is prohibited to use any transition funds for the purpose of paying a salary to a newly elected official prior to his or her assuming the office.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 186, §§ 1-5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-326 — 12-330; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3580.

25-16-206. [Repealed.]

25-16-301. Custodian of Senate Chamber and records.

The Lieutenant Governor is the custodian of the Senate Chamber, all Senate rooms, and the records, machines, furniture, fixtures, and supplies therein.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 219, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-308.

25-16-302. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the lieutenant governor's administrative assistant, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1296, § 83. The section was derived from Acts 1953, No. 219, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-309, 12-310.

Subchapter 4

— Secretary of State

Cross References. Secretary of State not to hold other office, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 22.

State institutions, Secretary of State not entitled to membership on boards of management, §25-17-203.

Monthly reports of fees to Treasurer of State, §21-7-203.

Quarterly reports of Secretary of State, §21-7-301.

Restriction on printing of biennial report, §21-7-401.

Effective Dates. Acts 1845, p. 45, § 7: effective on passage.

Acts 1895, No. 19, § 5: became law without Governor's signature, Feb. 22, 1895.

Acts 1923, No. 136, § 3: Emergency declared.

25-16-401. Bond.

The Secretary of State, before he or she enters upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall enter into bond, with good and sufficient security to the Governor and his or her successors in office, in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000). The bond shall be approved by the Governor and conditioned that the Secretary of State will well and truly perform and discharge the several trusts and duties of Secretary of State and in all things touching and concerning the office shall well, truly, and faithfully execute and perform them. This bond shall be filed with the Auditor of State.

History.

Acts 1849, § 5, p. 75; C. & M. Dig., § 4391; Pope's Dig., § 5406; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-401.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The operation of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to §21-2-701 et seq. The section may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See §21-2-703.

25-16-402. Deputy.

The Secretary of State may appoint a deputy to aid him or her in the discharge of his or her duties whose acts, performed in the name of the Secretary of State, shall have the same validity as the acts of his or her principal.

The deputy, before he or she enters upon the performance of his or her duties, shall take an oath, which will be endorsed upon his or her letter of appointment, that he or she will perform all the duties of his or her office faithfully and according to law.

The corporation clerk of the office of Secretary of State shall also be a deputy Secretary of State.

In addition to the other duties required by law of the Secretary of State, he or she shall receive from the Secretary of the Senate and Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives the records, books, papers, and rolls of the General Assembly and file them as records of his or her office.

The Secretary of State shall keep a seal of office surrounded with the words “Seal of the Secretary of State, Arkansas” and shall make out and deliver, to any person requiring them, copies of any act, resolution, or order of the General Assembly, commissions, or other official acts of the Governor and of all rolls, records, documents, papers, bonds, and recognizances deposited in his or her office and required by law to be kept there.

He or she shall certify the copies under his or her hand and affix the seal of his or her office thereto. The copies so authenticated shall be received in evidence in any court in this state with like effect as the original.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 1454, § 2, provided: “BROADBAND GRANTS RULES AND REGULATIONS AND PUBLIC NOTICE CALENDAR SAVINGS REPORT. The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the use of revenues collected and the disbursement of Broadband Enhancements Grants with prior review by the Administrative Rules and Regulations Subcommittee of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee. The Secretary of State shall report annually to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee estimated savings from the implementation of the State Internet Public Notice Calendar.”

Cross References. Fees of Secretary of State, §21-6-202.

Issuance of grants, commissions, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 10.

Record of official acts, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 21.

Ark. L. Rev.

Documentary Evidence — Arkansas, 15 Ark. L. Rev. 79.

The proof of publication of notice of intention to introduce a local bill attached to the act when filed in the office of the Secretary of State did not come within the terms of subsection (e) since the proof was not a record required by law to be kept by the Secretary. Wacaster v. City of Hot Springs, 165 Ark. 521, 265 S.W. 59 (1924).

Upon proof that a report of the state debt board has been lost, a copy of it, embodied in the original journal of the senate, may be read in evidence. Woodruff v. State, 61 Ark. 157, 32 S.W. 102 (1895).

Records of Secretary of State must be considered along with the journals of each house in determining whether a bill has passed both houses. Butler v. Board of Dirs., 103 Ark. 109, 146 S.W. 120 (1912).

Publisher's Notes. This section, requiring the Secretary of State to make a biennial report to the Governor, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 256, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1895, No. 19, §§ 1, 2, 4, p. 23; C. & M. Dig., § 4407; Pope's Dig., § 5422; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-406 — 12-408.

History.

Acts 1845, §§ 1, 7, p. 45; C. & M. Dig., § 4399; Acts 1923, No. 136, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 5414, 5442; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-409, 12-410, 12-412.

25-16-403. Powers and duties generally.

The Secretary of State shall reside and keep his or her office at the seat of government and shall have the custody of all records, rolls, and documents which properly belong to the state.

He or she shall keep a register of all the official acts and proceedings of the Governor and, when required, shall lay the register and all papers, minutes, and vouchers relative to the register before the General Assembly.

He or she shall affix the seal of the state and attest all commissions issued by the Governor and all other official acts of the Governor which require the seal of the state.

History.

Acts 1849, §§ 1, 3, 4, p. 75; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4121, 4392, 4397, 4398, 4400; Pope's Dig., §§ 5130, 5407, 5412, 5413, 5415; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-402 — 12-405.

25-16-404. [Repealed.]

The Secretary of State shall have the authority to issue an Arkansas Ambassador's Certificate, which may be given to citizens of the State of Arkansas who will be traveling outside the state. The Secretary of State may adopt such reasonable rules as may be necessary for the effective implementation of this section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1058, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2923.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

Subchapter 5

— Auditor of State

Cross References. Auditor of State not to hold other office, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 22.

State institutions, Auditor of State not entitled to membership on boards of management, §25-17-203.

Preambles. Acts 1853, p. 127 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, it is proper that the Governor should have in his possession the reports of the various state officers, showing the condition of the affairs of the state, to enable him to prepare his message to the General Assembly, with convenience, and based on official information; therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1853, p. 127, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1866, No. 4, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1868, No. 35, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 34, § 2: Nov. 30, 1875.

Acts 1877, No. 29, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1881, No. 97, § 2: became law without Governor's signature, Apr. 9, 1881.

Acts 1883, No. 17, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1883, No. 114, § 226: effective on passage.

Acts 1915, No. 104, § 5: approved Mar. 3, 1915. Emergency declared.

Acts 1921, No. 321, § 2: Mar. 15, 1921. Emergency declared.

Acts 1953, No. 334, § 4: July 1, 1953.

Acts 1983, No. 697, § 3[4]: Mar. 23, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that procedures are needed whereby the State Treasurer may obtain reimbursement on any uncollectible State warrants or checks received by the Office in a normal course of business, and that the methods set forth in this Act will provide a procedure whereby the State Treasurer may obtain such reimbursement in a businesslike manner; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable the State Treasurer to perform the duties of said Office in a businesslike manner. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1453, § 49: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that proper and effective management requires that changes to the state's finance and accounting laws begin on the first day of the fiscal year and that if there is an extended recess of the General Assembly, the required ninety day period may extend past July 1. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-16-501. Violation of law by Auditor of State.

If the Auditor of State shall willfully neglect or refuse to perform any duty enjoined by law, or shall be guilty of any oppression or extortion in the performance of any legal duty, or shall receive any fee or reward for the performance of any legal duty not allowed by law, or shall by color of his or her office knowingly do any act not authorized by law, or shall use any of the moneys belonging to the state, or shall perform any other duty of his or her office in any other manner than is required by law, then he or she shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor in office and upon conviction, he or she shall forfeit for the use of the state any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 34; C. & M. Dig., § 2812; Pope's Dig., § 3530; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-537.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 34, is also codified as §25-16-601.

25-16-502. Bond.

Immediately after his or her election, the Auditor of State shall execute and deliver to the Governor a bond to the State of Arkansas, with good and sufficient securities, in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), conditioned for the faithful performance of all the duties required, or which may be required, of him or her by law.

The Governor shall endorse on the bond of the Auditor of State his or her approval of the bond, stating the time of approval, and deliver the endorsed bond to the Secretary of State, who shall file it among the records of his or her office.

If any Auditor of State shall neglect or refuse to enter into bond within ten (10) days after the Governor is officially informed of his or her election, then the Office of Auditor of State shall be deemed and considered vacant.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The operation of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to §21-2-701 et seq. The section may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See §21-2-703.

Failure of the Governor to approve the bond, or to endorse approval, does not destroy the contract obligation. Auditor v. Woodruff, 2 Ark. 73 (1839).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, §§ 2, 3, 5; Acts 1861, No. 81, § 2, p. 174; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4386, 4441, 4442; Pope's Dig., §§ 5398, 5476, 5477; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-501 — 12-503.

25-16-503. Seal.

The Auditor of State shall keep a seal of office, which shall be used to authenticate all writings, papers, and documents required by law to be certified from his or her office.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 4443; Pope's Dig., § 5478; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-504.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 6, is also codified as §25-16-602.

25-16-504. Deputy.

The Auditor of State is authorized to appoint one (1) deputy. The appointment shall be made in writing.

The deputy so appointed shall take the oath prescribed by law. The oath shall be endorsed on the letter of appointment, and the letter of appointment shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

The Auditor of State shall be responsible on his or her official bond for all the acts done and performed by his or her deputy in the performance of his or her official duties.

Every deputy appointed under this section shall possess all the powers of his or her principal and may perform any of the duties required by law to be performed by his or her principal.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1866, No. 4, §§ 1 and 2, are also codified as §25-16-603.

History.

Acts 1866, No. 4, §§ 1, 2, p. 20; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4444, 4445; Pope's Dig., §§ 5479, 5480; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-505, 12-506.

25-16-505. Duties generally.

It shall be the duty of the Auditor of State:

To audit, adjust, and settle all claims against the state payable out of the State Treasury, except those claims which may be expressly required by law to be audited and settled by some other officer or person;

To draw all warrants upon the State Treasury for money, except in cases otherwise expressly provided by law;

To audit, settle, and adjust the accounts of all collectors of revenue and other holders of public money who are required by law to pay the money into the State Treasury;

To keep an account between the state and the Treasurer of State;

To keep an account of all moneys paid into the State Treasury for the use of every county;

To keep an account between the state and the United States, and between the state and every officer or person with whom the state may have dealings, and to keep an account of any separate fund in the State Treasury authorized by law;

To direct prosecutions in the name of the state for all official delinquencies in relation to the assessment, collection, and payment of the revenue against all persons who by any means become possessed of public money or property and fail to pay over and deliver it and to direct prosecutions against all debtors of the state;

To annually procure from the proper officer an abstract and description of all taxable lands within the state;

To annually furnish the proper officer in each county in the month of January a descriptive list of all taxable lands in the county not previously furnished;

To give information in writing to either house of the General Assembly, whenever required, upon any subject relating to the fiscal affairs of the state or touching any duty of his or her office; and

To perform all such other duties as may be required by law.

Cross References. Fees of Auditor of State, §21-6-201.

Voter registration, duties, Ark. Const. Amend. 51, §§ 5, 8, 14.

Where the Auditor refuses to allow a claim, the claimant should apply for redress to the legislature. Jobe v. Urquhart, 102 Ark. 470, 143 S.W. 121 (1912).

Where the Auditor, in the discharge of his appropriate duties, has a discretion in allowing or rejecting a claim against the state, and exercises it, his discretion cannot be controlled or reviewed by mandamus. Danley v. Whitley, 14 Ark. (1 Barber) 687 (1854).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 4456; Pope's Dig., § 5491; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-508; Acts 2001, No. 1453, § 4.

25-16-506. Access to other offices.

The Auditor of State shall have free access to all the other offices of the state for the inspection, concerning his or her duties, of all books, accounts, and papers which they respectively contain.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 30; C. & M. Dig., § 4447; Pope's Dig., § 5482; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-517.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 30, is also codified as §25-16-605.

25-16-507. Power to administer oaths.

The Auditor of State shall have power to administer oaths required or allowed by law in all matters touching the duties of his or her office.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 29; C. & M. Dig., § 4446; Pope's Dig., § 5481; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-507.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 29, is also codified as §25-16-606.

25-16-508. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the printing of blanks for commissions for state officers and teacher licenses by the Auditor of State, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1276, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1915, No. 104, §§ 3, 4; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4450, 4451; Pope's Dig., §§ 5485, 5486; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-515, 12-516.

25-16-509. Certification of payments.

Whenever any person indebted to the state, on any account whatever, shall present to the Auditor of State the Treasurer of State's receipt for the full payment of the amount due, it shall be the duty of the Auditor of State to furnish that person with a certificate, under the Auditor of State's hand and official seal, of the person having made full payment of all demands against him or her in favor of the state.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 25; C. & M. Dig., § 4465; Pope's Dig., § 5500; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-520.

25-16-510. Auditor of State as state accountant.

The Auditor of State shall be the general accountant of the state and shall keep all public accounts, books, vouchers, documents, and all papers relating to the contracts of the state and its debts, revenue, and fiscal affairs which are not required by law to be placed in some other office or kept by some other person.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 4449; Pope's Dig., § 5484; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-509.

25-16-511. Recordkeeping requirements.

The Auditor of State shall keep a letter book in which he or she shall copy all official letters which may be written by him or her.

All accounts, vouchers, and documents settled by the Auditor of State shall be preserved in his or her office, and copies of these records, authenticated by the official seal, shall be given to any person interested who may require them.

However, the Auditor of State is authorized to destroy all vouchers and Treasurer of State's receipts on file in his or her office after the expiration of five (5) years from the date of their filing, provided that no vouchers of any department or institution shall be destroyed while any legislative investigation of the department or institution is in progress.

The Auditor of State is authorized and directed to keep a register in his or her office of all checks which have been drawn upon state agency bank funds and approved for payment by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

The secretary is directed to transmit to the Auditor of State all documents and information necessary to prepare this register.

The Auditor of State's register of bank fund checks and document files shall in all respects be equal to the records of state-appropriated funds required by law to be kept and maintained by the Auditor of State.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 31, is also codified as §25-16-613.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (c)(1); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (c)(2).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning the examination of the books of the Auditor of State during a legislative session and the duty of the Auditor of State to provide a report to the Governor of revenue and funds available, were repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1276, §§ 4-6. The sections were derived from the following sources.

25-16-512. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, §§ 36-39; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4477-4480; Pope’s Dig., §§ 5513-5516; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-533 — 12-536.

25-16-513. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 8; Acts 1853, § 1, p. 127; 1877, No. 29, § 1, p. 25; 1881, No. 97, § 1, p. 193; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4452-4454; Pope’s Dig., §§ 5487-5489; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-302, 12-511 — 12-513; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 47.

25-16-514. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 41; C. & M. Dig., § 4455; Pope’s Dig., § 5490; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-514.

Cross References. Fees in actions by state, warrant for payment, §16-106-108.

Mandamus will lie to compel an auditor to draw his warrant for an officer's salary. Cotham v. Coffman, 111 Ark. 108, 163 S.W. 1183 (1914).

Cited: Hays v. McDaniel, 130 Ark. 52, 196 S.W. 934 (1917); Democrat Printing & Lithographing Co. v. Parker, 192 Ark. 989, 96 S.W.2d 16 (1936).

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 17, is also codified as §25-16-607.

Cross References. Claims on institutions not according to law, issuance of warrant prohibited, §25-17-102.

No money to be paid from State Treasury without appropriation, Ark. Const., Art. 16, § 12.

Appropriation denotes the setting apart or assigning to a particular use of a certain sum of money for a specified purpose in such a manner that the public officials are authorized to draw or use the sum so set apart and no more for the purpose specified and for no other. Dickinson v. Clibourn, 125 Ark. 101, 187 S.W. 909 (1916).

Mandamus did not lie to compel issuance of warrant where no appropriation had been made by the General Assembly and no allowance of claim had been made by the claims commission. Winn v. Humphrey, 195 Ark. 131, 111 S.W.2d 468 (1937).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, §§ 15, 31; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4448, 4464; Acts 1921, No. 321, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 5483, 5499, 5501; Acts 1953, No. 334, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-510, 12-518, 12-519, 12-538 — 12-540; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3581.

25-16-512 — 25-16-514. [Repealed.]

It shall be the duty of the Auditor of State at the expiration of the time for which each and every appropriation is made to report to the Treasurer of State the total amount of the warrants drawn on the appropriations during the term. If any balance remains unexpended of any appropriation for which no warrant has been drawn, the Treasurer of State shall balance the accounts and cover the balance into the State Treasury.

In no case shall the Auditor of State carry forward from one (1) term to another an unexpended balance of any appropriation after the time for which it was made has expired.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 17, §§ 1, 3, p. 15; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4471, 4473; Pope's Dig., §§ 5507, 5509; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-528, 12-529.

25-16-516. Warrants — Form and record.

In all cases of accounts audited and allowed against the state and in all cases of grants, salaries, and expenses allowed by law, the Auditor of State shall draw warrants upon the State Treasury for the amount due, in the following form:

“No.
STATE OF ARKANSAS. Auditor's Office,
Little Rock,
, 20 I certify that the sum of
dollars and
cents is due by the State of Arkansas to
, and do hereby direct that the Treasurer of said State pay to the said
, or bearer, the sum of
dollars and
cents, out of
. , Auditor. $ ”

Click to view form.

The Auditor of State shall number progressively all the warrants issued by him or her during each year, commencing on January 1 and ending on December 31.

The Auditor of State shall enter in a book to be kept for that purpose each warrant drawn by him or her on the State Treasury for the payment of money in the order in which the warrant shall be issued. The entry shall be in such manner as to show the number and date of each warrant, the name of the person in whose favor drawn, and for what it was drawn.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, §§ 16, 20, 21; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4466-4468; Pope's Dig., §§ 5502-5504; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-521 — 12-523.

25-16-517. Warrants — Restrictions on issuance.

No warrant shall be drawn by the Auditor of State unless the money has been previously appropriated by law, nor shall the amount drawn for under any one (1) head ever exceed the amount appropriated by law for that purpose.

The Auditor of State is denied authority to draw any warrant on the Treasurer of State to be paid out of the general revenue of the state for the support of common schools.

If the Auditor of State shall knowingly issue any warrant upon the State Treasury not authorized by law, he or she shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor in office. Upon conviction thereof, he or she shall forfeit, for the use of the state, any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, §§ 17, 32; Acts 1883, No. 114, § 208, p. 199; C. & M. Dig., §§ 2827, 4469, 10179; Pope's Dig., §§ 3545, 5505, 13962; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-524 — 12-526.

25-16-518. Warrants — Prohibitions against receipt in payment of debt to state, use as offset, and bearing of interest.

No warrant issued by the Auditor of State shall be received in payment of debts due the state, nor shall the warrants, under any circumstances, bear interest or be received or allowed as an offset in any suit commenced for the recovery of money due the state, but the warrant shall only be received and paid by the Treasurer of State.

History.

Acts 1845, § 20, p. 88; C. & M. Dig., § 4470; Pope's Dig., § 5506; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-527.

Cross References. Interest-bearing warrants or scrip prohibited, Ark. Const., Art. 16, § 1.